Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.070

Waiver of examination and licensing requirements—Applicants licensed in other states or territories.

(1) The board shall waive the examination and grant a license to a person engaged in the profession of an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant on June 7, 1984, if the board determines that the person meets commonly accepted standards for the profession, as established by rule of the board. The board may waive the examination, education, or experience requirements and grant a license to any person meeting the standards adopted by the board under this section after June 7, 1984, if the board considers the requirements for licensure in this chapter as having been met.

(2) The board may grant a license to any applicant who presents proof of current licensure as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia, or a territory of the United States, which requires standards for licensure considered by the board to be equivalent to the requirements for licensure under this chapter.

(3) The board shall waive the education and experience requirements for licensure in RCW 18.59.050(1) (c) and (d) for applicants for licensure who present evidence to the board that they have been engaged in the practice of occupational therapy for the three years immediately prior to June 7, 1984. The proof of actual practice shall be presented to the board in such a manner as the board prescribes by rule. To obtain the waiver, an applicant shall file an application for examination no later than six months from June 7, 1984. An applicant who has filed for examination under this subsection shall be excluded from the licensure requirement until the date the results of the examination are made public, and may conduct the appropriate activities under *RCW 18.59.030.

[ 1984 c 9 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.59.030 was repealed by 1986 c 259 s 103.